Utah statutes.
13-44-201.   Protection of personal information.
(1)  Any person who conducts business in the state and maintains personal
information shall implement and maintain reasonable procedures to:
(a)  prevent unlawful use or disclosure of personal information collected or
maintained in the regular course of business; and
(b)  destroy, or arrange for the destruction of, records containing personal
information that are not to be retained by the person.
(2)  The destruction of records under Subsection (1)(b) shall be by:
(a)  shredding;
(b)  erasing; or
(c)  otherwise modifying the personal information to make the information
indecipherable.
(3)  This section does not apply to a financial institution as defined by 15
U.S.C. Section 6809.
